District of Columbia statutes.
29A-201.39

Repealed

Sale, lease or exchange of property or assets as an entirety; approval of stockholders required; rights of dissenting stockholders.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, ch. 854, § 639d
Feb. 12, 1931, 46 Stat. 1089, ch. 120
June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1921, ch. 804
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 991, ch. 646, § 32(b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 589, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 168(d)(1)
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(1), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-201.39.
1981 Ed., § 29-240.
1973 Ed., § 29-240.